District of Columbia statutes.
7-223

Persons required to furnish information.

(a)

A person with information needed to complete a certificate or report required under this chapter regarding any birth, death, fetal death, marriage, divorce, or annulment shall give such information to the Registrar upon request.

(b)

Not later than the 10th day of the month following the month of occurrence, the administrator of each institution shall send to the vital records section a list showing each birth and death occurring in that institution during the preceding month.

(c)

Not later than the 10th day of the month following the month of occurrence, each funeral director shall send to the Registrar a list showing each dead body embalmed or otherwise prepared for final disposition or finally disposed of by the funeral director during the preceding month.

Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-34, § 24, 28 DCR 3271
1981 Ed., § 6-223.